Georgia statutes. TITLE 30 Handicapped Persons
CHAPTER 5 Protection of Disabled Adults and Elder Persons

Cross references.

Alzheimer’s and Related Dementias State Plan, § T. 49, C. 6, Art. 8.

Trafficking of a disabled adult, elder person, or resident; penalty, §

16-5-102.1

.

Residential care facilities for the elderly authorities, T. 31, C. 7, Art. 5.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Clients rights, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Department of Human Services, Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities and Addictive Diseases, Subject 290-4-9.

Law reviews.

For article, “The United Nations Convention on the Rights of Persons with Disabilities and its Implications for the Rights of Elderly People under International Law,” see 25 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 527 (2009).

For article, “Disability Rights, Disability Discrimination, and Social Insurance,” see 25 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 575 (2009).

For article, “‘Simplify You, Classify You’:
Stigma, Stereotypes and Civil Rights in Disability Classification Systems,” see
25 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 607 (2009).

30-5-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Disabled Adults and Elder Persons Protection Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1320, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 700, § 2.

30-5-2.
Legislative purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide protective services for abused, neglected, or exploited disabled adults and elder persons. It is not the purpose of this chapter to place restrictions upon the personal liberty of disabled adults or elder persons, but this chapter should be liberally construed to assure the availability of protective services to all disabled adults and elder persons in need of them.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1320, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 700, § 2.

Cross references.

Rights of persons residing in long-term care facilities generally, § 31-8-100 et seq.

30-5-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Abuse” means the willful infliction of physical pain, physical injury, sexual abuse, mental anguish, unreasonable confinement, or the willful deprivation of essential services to a disabled adult or elder person.

(1.1)

“Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team” means the multiagency team established in each judicial circuit in this state pursuant to Code Section 30-5-11.

“Caretaker” means a person who has the responsibility for the care of a disabled adult or elder person as a result of family relationship, contract, voluntary assumption of that responsibility, or by operation of law.

“Department” means the Department of Human Services.

“Director” means the director of the Division of Aging Services of the Department of Human Services, or the director’s designee.

“Disabled adult” means a person 18 years of age or older who is not a resident, but who:

Is mentally or physically incapacitated;

Has Alzheimer’s disease, as defined in Code Section 31-8-180; or

Has dementia, as defined in Code Section 16-5-100.

“Elder person” means a person 65 years of age or older who is not a resident.

“Essential services” means social, medical, psychiatric, or legal services necessary to safeguard the disabled adult’s or elder person’s rights and resources and to maintain the physical and mental well-being of such person. These services shall include, but not be limited to, the provision of medical care for physical and mental health needs, assistance in personal hygiene, food, clothing, adequately heated and ventilated shelter, and protection from health and safety hazards but shall not include the taking into physical custody of a disabled adult or elder person without that person’s consent.

“Exploitation” means the illegal or improper use of a disabled adult or elder person or that person’s resources through undue influence, coercion, harassment, duress, deception, false representation, false pretense, or other similar means for one’s own or another’s profit or advantage.

“Fiduciary” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 7-1-4.

“Financial institution” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 7-1-4.

“Investment company” means an individual or a corporation, a partnership, a limited liability corporation, a joint-stock company, a trust, a fund, or any organized group of persons whether incorporated that:

Is engaged or proposes to engage in the business of effecting transactions in securities;

Is engaged or proposes to engage in the business of issuing securities, or has been engaged in such business and has any certificates outstanding; or

Is engaged or holds itself out to be in the business of advising others, either directly or through publications or writings, as to the value of securities or the advisability of investing in, purchasing, or selling securities or that, for compensation and as a part of a regular business, issues or promulgates analysis or reports concerning securities.

“Long-term care facility” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 31-8-81.

“Mentally or physically incapacitated” means an impairment which substantially affects an individual’s ability to:

Provide personal protection;

Provide necessities, including but not limited to food, shelter, clothing, medical, or other health care;

Carry out the activities of daily living; or

Manage his or her resources.

“Neglect” means the absence or omission of essential services to the degree that it harms or threatens with harm the physical or emotional health of a disabled adult or elder person.

“Protective services” means services necessary to protect a disabled adult or elder person from abuse, neglect, or exploitation. Such services shall include, but not be limited to, evaluation of the need for services and mobilization of essential services on behalf of a disabled adult or elder person.

“Resident” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 31-8-81.

“Security” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 10-5-2.

“Sexual abuse” means the coercion for the purpose of self-gratification by a guardian or other person supervising the welfare or having immediate charge, control, or custody of a disabled adult or elder person to engage in any of the following conduct:

Lewd exhibition of the genitals or pubic area of any person;

Flagellation or torture by or upon a person who is unclothed or partially unclothed;

Condition of being fettered, bound, or otherwise physically restrained on the part of a person who is unclothed or partially clothed unless physical restraint is medically indicated;

Physical contact in an act of sexual stimulation or gratification with any person’s unclothed genitals, pubic area, or buttocks or with a female’s nude breasts;

Defecation or urination for the purpose of sexual stimulation of the viewer; or

Penetration of the vagina or rectum by any object except when done as part of a recognized medical or nursing procedure.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1320, § 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 700, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 30; Ga. L. 2005, p. 509, § 6/HB 394; Ga. L. 2007, p. 219, § 1/HB 233; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 725, § 1/HB 457; Ga. L. 2013, p. 524, § 1-5/HB 78; Ga. L. 2015, p. 598, § 1-6/HB 72; Ga. L. 2018, p. 602, § 1/HB 635.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added paragraph (1.1).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 63 (2015).

30-5-4.
Reporting of need for protective services; manner and contents of report; immunity from civil or criminal liability; privileged communications.

The following persons having reasonable cause to believe that a disabled adult or elder person has been the victim of abuse, other than by accidental means, or has been neglected or exploited shall report or cause reports to be made in accordance with the provisions of this Code section:

Any person required to report child abuse as provided in subsection (c) of Code Section 19-7-5;

Physical therapists;

Occupational therapists;

Day-care personnel;

Coroners;

Medical examiners;

Emergency medical services personnel, as such term is defined in Code Section 31-11-49;

Any person who has been certified as an emergency medical technician, cardiac technician, paramedic, or first responder pursuant to Chapter 11 of Title 31;

Employees of a public or private agency engaged in professional health related services to elder persons or disabled adults; and

Clergy members.

Any employee of a financial institution or investment company having reasonable cause to believe that a disabled adult or elder person has been exploited shall report or cause reports to be made in accordance with the provisions of this Code section; provided, however, that this obligation shall not apply to any employee of a financial institution or investment company while that employee is acting as a fiduciary, but only for such assets that the employee is holding or managing in a fiduciary capacity.

When the person having a reasonable cause to believe that a disabled adult or elder person is in need of protective services performs services as a member of the staff of a hospital, social agency, financial institution, or similar facility, such person shall notify the person in charge of the facility and such person or that person’s designee shall report or cause reports to be made in accordance with the provisions of this Code section.

Any other person having a reasonable cause to believe that a disabled adult or elder person is in need of protective services or has been the victim of abuse, neglect, or exploitation may report such information as provided in this Code section.

A report that a disabled adult or elder person is in need of protective services or has been the victim of abuse, neglect, or exploitation shall be made to an adult protection agency providing protective services as designated by the department and to an appropriate law enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney. If a report of a disabled adult or elder person abuse, neglect, or exploitation is made to an adult protection agency or independently discovered by the agency, then the agency shall immediately make a reasonable determination based on available information as to whether the incident alleges actions by an individual, other than the disabled adult or elder person, that constitute a crime and include such information in their report. If a crime is suspected, the report shall immediately be forwarded to the appropriate law enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney. During an adult protection agency’s investigation, it shall be under a continuing obligation to immediately report the discovery of any evidence that may constitute a crime.

If the disabled adult or person is 65 years of age or older and is a resident, a report shall be made in accordance with Article 4 of Chapter 8 of Title 31. If a report made in accordance with the provisions of this Code section alleges that the abuse or exploitation occurred within a long-term care facility, such report shall be investigated in accordance with Articles 3 and 4 of Chapter 8 of Title 31.

Reporting required by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this subsection may be made by oral or written communication. Such report shall include the name and address of the disabled adult or elder person and should include the name and address of the disabled adult’s or elder person’s caretaker, the age of the disabled adult or elder person, the nature and extent of the disabled adult’s or elder person’s injury or condition resulting from abuse, exploitation, or neglect, and other pertinent information.

When a report of a disabled adult’s or elder person’s abuse, neglect, or exploitation is originally reported to a law enforcement agency, it shall be forwarded by such agency to the director or his or her designee within 24 hours of receipt.

Anyone who makes a report pursuant to this chapter, who testifies in any judicial proceeding arising from the report, who provides protective services, who participates in a required investigation, or who participates on an Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team under the provisions of this chapter shall be immune from any civil liability or criminal prosecution on account of such report or testimony or participation, unless such person acted in bad faith, with a malicious purpose, or was a party to such crime or fraud. Any financial institution or investment company, including without limitation officers and directors thereof, that is an employer of anyone who makes a report pursuant to this chapter in his or her capacity as an employee, or who testifies in any judicial proceeding arising from a report made in his or her capacity as an employee, or who participates in a required investigation under the provisions of this chapter in his or her capacity as an employee, shall be immune from any civil liability or criminal prosecution on account of such report or testimony or participation of its employee, unless such financial institution or investment company knew or should have known that the employee acted in bad faith or with a malicious purpose and failed to take reasonable and available measures to prevent such employee from acting in bad faith or with a malicious purpose. The immunity described in this subsection shall apply not only with respect to the acts of making a report, testifying in a judicial proceeding arising from a report, providing protective services, or participating in a required investigation but also shall apply with respect to the content of the information communicated in such acts.

Any suspected abuse, neglect, exploitation, or need for protective services which is required to be reported by any person pursuant to this Code section shall be reported notwithstanding that the reasonable cause to believe such abuse, neglect, exploitation, or need for protective services has occurred or is occurring is based in whole or in part upon any communication to that person which is otherwise made privileged or confidential by law; provided, however, that a member of the clergy shall not be required to report such matters confided to him or her solely within the context of confession or other similar communication required to be kept confidential under church doctrine or practice. When a clergy member receives information about abuse, neglect, exploitation, or the need for protective services from any other source, the clergy member shall comply with the reporting requirements of this Code section, even though the clergy member may have also received a report of such matters from the confession of the perpetrator.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1320, § 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 785, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 30; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1608, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 700, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1085, § 6; Ga. L. 2013, p. 524, § 1-6/HB 78; Ga. L. 2015, p. 598, § 1-7/HB 72; Ga. L. 2018, p. 602, § 2/HB 635.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “protection” for “protective” at the beginning of the last sentence of subparagraph (b)(1)(A); substituted “subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1)” for “subparagraph (A)(1)” in the middle of the first sentence of paragraph (b)(2); and, in subsection (c), in the middle of the first sentence, deleted “or” following “protective services,” and inserted “, or who participates on an Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team”.

Cross references.

Reporting of abuse or exploitation of residents of long-term care facilities, § 31-8-80 et seq.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, a comma was deleted following “investigation” in the last sentence of subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1085, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Protection of Elder Persons Act of 2000’.”

Law reviews.

For note on 2000 amendment of this Code section, see 17 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 93 (2000).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 63 (2015).

30-5-4.1.
Discrimination and retaliation for reporting prohibited.

No person shall discriminate or retaliate in any manner against:

Any person who makes a report pursuant to this chapter, who testifies in any judicial proceeding arising from the report, who provides protective services, who participates in an investigation, or who participates on an Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team under the provisions of this chapter; or

Any disabled adult or elder person who is the subject of a report.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-5-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 95, § 1/HB 987.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective June 30, 2020.

30-5-5.
Investigation of reports of need for protective services; interference with investigation; provision of protective services.

When the director receives a report that a disabled adult or elder person is in need of protective services, he or she shall conduct or have conducted a prompt and thorough investigation to determine whether the disabled adult or elder person is in need of protective services and what services are needed. The investigation shall include a visit to the person and consultation with others having knowledge of the facts of the particular case. Within ten days after receipt of the report, the director shall acknowledge receipt of the report, in writing, to the person making the report.

Any person conducting an investigation required by this Code section who is unable to gain access to the disabled adult or elder person as a result of interference by another person may petition the court for an order authorizing the investigation and prohibiting interference therewith, which petition shall allege specific facts in support thereof. A hearing upon such petition and notice thereof shall be carried out pursuant to subsection (f) of this Code section. If as a result of the hearing the court finds probable cause to believe that the person named in the petition is a disabled adult in need of protective services or an elder person needing protective services and that any other person is interfering with the conduct of an investigation required under this Code section, the court may issue an order authorizing that investigation and prohibiting interference therewith by any person.

If as a result of an investigation conducted under this chapter the director determines that a disabled adult or elder person is in need of protective services, the director shall immediately provide or arrange for protective services for any disabled adult or elder person who consents thereto.

Any person providing protective services as authorized by subsection (c) of this Code section who determines that another person is interfering with the provision of such services may petition the court for an order authorizing such services and prohibiting interference therewith. Such petition shall allege specific facts in support thereof, including, but not limited to, the results of any investigation required to be made under this chapter. A hearing upon such petition and notice thereof shall be carried out pursuant to subsection (f) of this Code section. If as a result of the hearing the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the person named in the petition is a disabled adult in need of protective services or an elder person needing protective services and that any other person is interfering with the provision of such services, the court may issue an order authorizing the provision of such services and prohibiting the interference therewith by any person.

Protective services may not be provided under this chapter to any person who does not consent to such services or who, having consented, withdraws such consent. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the department from petitioning for the appointment of a guardian for a disabled adult or elder person pursuant to Chapters 4 and 5 of Title 29.

A hearing on any petition filed under this Code section shall be held no sooner than five and no later than ten days after such petition is filed, unless a continuance is granted. At least three days prior to such hearing, notice thereof shall be served on the petitioner and notice and copy of the petition shall be served on the person alleged to be a disabled adult in need of protective services or an elder person needing protective services and on such person or persons named in the petition as interfering with the investigation or with the provision of protective services, as applicable. Notice shall be served either in person or by first-class mail. Any person willfully violating any order issued pursuant to this Code section shall be in contempt of the court issuing such order and may be punished accordingly by the judge of that court.

The expenses of the court and the hearing officer for any hearing conducted under this Code section shall be the same as those provided in Code Section 37-3-122 and shall be paid as provided therein. A disabled adult or elder person shall be deemed to be a patient under Code Section 37-3-122 only for purposes of determining hearing expenses thereunder. Nothing in this Code section shall authorize the payment of attorney’s fees for any hearing conducted under this Code section.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Code section, if the director or adult protection agency employee receives a report or gains knowledge that a disabled adult or elder person is in need of protective services and such disabled adult or elder person may be in imminent danger resulting from abuse, exploitation, or neglect, the director or designee of the director may file a petition with the probate or superior court stating the grounds on which the director or designee of the director believes that the disabled adult or elder person may be in imminent danger and seeking immediate access to such person. The judge, in his or her discretion, may issue an ex parte order requiring the caretaker or any other person at the place where the disabled adult or elder person resides to afford an adult protection agency employee immediate access to such person to determine the person’s well-being. If the adult protection agency employee is denied access to the disabled adult or elder person, the employee shall contact immediately a law enforcement officer to assist the employee in enforcing such order. Any person willfully violating any order issued pursuant to this subsection shall be in contempt of the court issuing such order and may be punished accordingly by the judge of the court. The adult protection agency employee shall conduct a brief investigation to determine the condition of the disabled adult or elder person.

In any case in which the judge of the court is unable to hear a case brought under this chapter within the time required for such hearing, such judge shall appoint a person to serve and exercise all the jurisdiction of the court in such case. Any person so appointed shall be a member of the State Bar of Georgia and be otherwise qualified for his or her duties by training and experience. Such appointment may be made on a case-by-case basis or by making a standing appointment of one or more persons. Any person receiving such standing appointment shall serve at the pleasure of the judge making the appointment or said judge’s successor in office to hear such cases if and when necessary. The compensation of a person so appointed shall be as agreed upon by the judge who makes the appointment and the person appointed, with the approval of the governing authority of the county for which such person is appointed, and shall be paid from the county funds of such county. All fees collected for the services of such appointed person shall be paid into the general funds of the county served.

As used in this Code section, the term “court” means the probate court for the county of residence of the disabled adult or elder person or the county in which such person is found.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1320, § 5; Ga. L. 1984, p. 785, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 30; Ga. L. 1997, p. 700, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 562, § 6; Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 6; Ga. L. 2005, p. 509, § 7/HB 394; Ga. L. 2013, p. 524, § 1-7/HB 78.

Cross references.

Reporting of abuse or exploitation of residents of long-term care facilities, § 31-8-80 et seq.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, “subsection” was substituted for “paragraph” in subsection (h).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1999, p. 562, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Crimes Against Elderly Act of 1999’.”

30-5-6.
Cooperation of other public agencies with director; power of director to contract for provision of medical evaluations; regulations.

The staff and physicians of local health departments, mental health clinics, and other public agencies shall cooperate fully with the director in the performance of the director’s duties under this chapter.

The director may contract with an agency or private physician for the purpose of providing immediate accessible medical evaluations in the location that the director deems most appropriate.

The Board of Human Services shall adopt regulations to ensure the effective implementation of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1320, § 6; Ga. L. 1997, p. 700, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-3/HB 228.

30-5-7.
Confidentiality of public records; reasonable access; redaction in certain circumstances.

All records pertaining to the abuse, neglect, or exploitation of disabled adults or elder persons in the custody of the department shall be confidential; and access thereto by persons other than the department, the director, or the district attorney shall only be by valid subpoena or order of any court of competent jurisdiction.

The following persons or agencies shall have reasonable access to such records concerning reports of elder, disabled adult, or resident abuse:

A prosecuting attorney in this state or any other state or political subdivision thereof, or the United States, who may seek such access in connection with official duty;

Police or any other law enforcement agency or law enforcement personnel of this state or any other state who are conducting an investigation into any criminal offense involving a report of known or suspected abuse, neglect, or exploitation of disabled adults or elder persons;

Agencies participating in joint investigations at the request of and with the department, or conducting separate investigations of abuse, neglect, or exploitation within an agency’s scope of authority, unless such records are wholly owned by the federal government; and

Coroners or medical examiners in suspicious death investigations.

Any individual who made a report according to Code Section 30-5-4 can make a request to the department to know if the report or reports made by that individual have been received, whether an investigation was opened or not, and whether the investigation is still open or has been closed, and the department will respond in writing within five business days with this information, but no other case information will be released.

Any time that the record is released pursuant to this Code section, other than to law enforcement or to the district attorney or pursuant to a court order for unredacted records, the name and identifying information of the individual who made the report shall be redacted.

Records or portions of records of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of disabled adults or elder persons in the custody of the department may be released to members of an Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team established pursuant to Code Section 30-5-11 for reasonable use in furtherance of the purposes authorized in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1320, § 7; Ga. L. 1997, p. 700, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 562, § 7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-14/HB 228; Ga. L. 2013, p. 524, § 1-8/HB 78; Ga. L. 2018, p. 602, § 3/HB 635.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, designated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a); deleted the former second sentence of subsection (a), which read: “Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to deny agencies participating in joint investigations at the request of and with the department, or conducting separate investigations of abuse, neglect, or exploitation within an agency’s scope of authority, or law enforcement personnel who are conducting an investigation into any criminal offense in which a disabled adult or elder person is a victim from having access to such records.”; and added subsections (b) through (e).

Cross references.

Reporting of abuse or exploitation of residents of long-term care facilities, § 31-8-80 et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1999, p. 562, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:
“This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Crimes Against Elderly Act of 1999’.”

30-5-8.
Criminal offenses and penalties.

It shall be unlawful for any person or official required by paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 30-5-4 to report a case of disabled adult or elder person abuse to fail knowingly and willfully to make such report.

Any person violating the provisions of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any violation of this Code section shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-5-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 785, § 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 700, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 562, § 8; Ga. L. 2001, p. 484, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 298, § 1A; Ga. L. 2007, p. 219, § 2/HB 233; Ga. L. 2009, p. 725, § 2/HB 457; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 30/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2012, p. 351, § 1/HB 1110; Ga. L. 2013, p. 524, § 1-9/HB 78.

Cross references.

Adult Day Center for Aging Adults Licensure Act, §

49-6-80

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1999, p. 562, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Crimes Against Elderly Act of 1999’.”

30-5-9.
Applicability to employment relationship.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the application of Code Section 34-7-1 to the employment relationship between a disabled adult or elder person and his or her employer or to create a new cause of action as a result of the employment relationship.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-5-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 700, § 2.

30-5-10.
Cooperative effort in development of programs relating to abuse and exploitation of disabled adults, elder persons, and residents of long-term care facilities.

The department, the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia, and the Institute of Continuing Judicial Education shall develop programs for the education and training of social services, criminal justice, and judicial professionals concerning the abuse, neglect, and exploitation of disabled adults, elder persons, and residents of long-term care facilities, as defined in Code Section 16-5-100. Said agencies, together with any other agency of this state which is involved in the investigation of the abuse, neglect, or exploitation of disabled adults, elder persons, and residents of long-term care facilities, as defined in Code Section 16-5-100, are directed to cooperate in the development of such training programs to the extent allowable under Article I, Section II, Paragraph III of the Constitution of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-5-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1085, § 7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2013, p. 524, § 1-10/HB 78.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “Officer” was substituted for “Officers” in the first sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1085, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Protection of Elder Persons Act of 2000’.”

Law reviews.

For note on 2000 enactment of O.C.G.A. §

30-5-10

, see 17 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 93 (2000).

30-5-11.
Establishment of Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team; membership; duties; creation of memorandum of understanding; confidentiality and limitations on disclosures; reporting and reviews.

The district attorney of each judicial circuit may establish, or cause to be established, an Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team for the purposes of:

Coordinating the collaborative review of suspected instances of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a disabled adult or elder person pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 16 or Code Section 30-5-5, 31-7-12.1, or 31-8-83;

Coordinating the collaborative review of responses to suspected instances of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a disabled adult or elder person, including protective services; and

Identifying opportunities within local jurisdictions to improve policies and procedures in the notification of and response to abuse, neglect, and exploitation given local resources.

As determined by the district attorney or his or her designee, the Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team shall consist of representatives, from within the appropriate judicial circuit, representing these suggested categories:

The district attorney or his or her designee;

Local law enforcement agencies;

The Georgia Bureau of Investigation;

Adult Protective Services of the department’s Division of Aging Services;

The state funded licensure activities of the Healthcare Facility Regulation Division of the Department of Community Health;

The Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities;

The medical examiner or coroner of that county in which the team exists;

Nonprofit organizations that provide victim services or adult care services;

Local, regional, and state task forces or coordinating entities regarding at-risk adults;

Providers of medical, legal, or housing services or housing facilities to disabled adults or elder persons who are victims of abuse, neglect, or exploitation; and

Any other entity which the district attorney or his or her designee determines is necessary for the successful operation of the Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team.

Each Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team shall:

Meet regularly, as determined by the district attorney or his or her designee; provided, however, that meetings shall be held at least semiannually; and

Coordinate on investigations of instances of unlicensed personal care homes, or of suspected abuse, neglect, or exploitation of disabled adults or elder persons that are based on reports made pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 16 or Code Section 30-5-4, 31-7-12.1, 31-8-82, or 31-8-83 or reports made or concerns raised by members of the agencies, organizations, or entities represented on the Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team.

The district attorney or his or her designee shall coordinate the creation of a memorandum of understanding that describes the Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team’s procedures and methods of operation in detail, including confidentiality requirements and the sharing of information among such team’s members in accordance with subsection (e) of this Code section. The memorandum shall be signed by a representative of each agency, organization, or entity participating in such team.

All records and information acquired by an Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team pertaining to the abuse, neglect, or exploitation of disabled adults or elder persons shall be confidential pursuant to Code Sections 30-5-7, 31-8-86, and 37-3-166; furthermore, notwithstanding any other provisions of law, information acquired by and documents, records, and reports of the team shall be confidential and shall not be subject to Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, relating to open records.

All records pertaining to the abuse, neglect, or exploitation of disabled adults or elder persons in the custody of the departments included in the Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team shall be available to the members of an Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team for the purpose of investigating or responding to a report of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a disabled adult, elder person, or resident.

It shall be unlawful for any member of an Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team to knowingly disclose, receive, make use of, or authorize, or knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce to the use of, any information received or generated in the course of the Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team’s investigations, responses, or activities to any third party; provided, however, that disclosure may be made to persons and entities directly involved in the administration of this Code section, including:

Persons providing protective services necessary for the disabled adult or elder person;

Representatives of law enforcement;

Grand juries or courts in the exercise of official business;

Members of such Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Teams; and

Persons engaged in bona fide research or audit purposes; provided, however, that only information in the aggregate without identifying information shall be provided for research or audit purposes and confidentiality of the data shall be maintained.

Unless expressly provided otherwise in the memorandum of understanding, members of an Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team may share information received or generated in the course of such team’s investigations, responses, or activities only among members of such team.

To promote efficiency and effectiveness in its mission, an Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team may maintain a data base of information about such team’s past and ongoing cases, provided that identifying information about individual victims and clients shall not be accessed by any person outside of such team other than those persons serving as care coordinators or victim advocates or who represent organizations providing such services.

By March 1 of each calendar year, the Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Teams shall submit a report to the director of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the commissioner of human services regarding the prevalence and circumstances of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of disabled adults or elder persons in this state; shall recommend measures to reduce such crimes; and shall address in the report the following issues:

How many investigations or cases the Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Team has received for the calendar year;

How many reviews of investigations or cases recommended criminal prosecution; and

Whether policy, procedural, regulatory, or statutory changes are called for as a result of these findings.

The Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Multidisciplinary Teams shall also establish procedures for the conduct of reviews by local review committees into abuse, neglect, or exploitation of disabled adults or elder persons and may obtain the assistance from disabled adults or elder persons.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-5-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 602, § 4/HB 635.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2018.